Utah statutes.
10-9a-207.   Notice for an amendment to a subdivision -- Notice for vacation of or change to street.

(1) (a)  For an amendment to a subdivision, each municipality shall provide notice of the date, time, and place of at least one public meeting, as provided in Subsection (1)(b).

(b)  At least 10 calendar days before the public meeting, the notice required under Subsection (1)(a) shall be:

(i)  mailed and addressed to the record owner of each parcel within specified parameters of that property; or

(ii)  posted on the property proposed for subdivision, in a visible location, with a sign of sufficient size, durability, and print quality that is reasonably calculated to give notice to passers-by.

(2)  Each municipality shall provide notice as required by Section 10-9a-208 for a subdivision that involves a vacation, alteration, or amendment of a street.

